Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB52.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 6BUILDING PERMITS AND ENDANGEREDAND THREATENED SPECIESSection 601. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819 "Applicant." A person seeking a building permit from a municipality for proposed construction."Endangered or threatened species." Any of the following:(1) An endangered species as defined under any of the following:(i) 30 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(ii) 34 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(2) A threatened species as defined under any of the following:(i) 30 Pa.C.S. § 102.(ii) 34 Pa.C.S. § 102.(3) A classification established under section 7(b) of the act of June 23, 1982 (P.L.597, No.170), known as the Wild Resource Conservation Act, and regulations promulgated in accordance with that act."Proposed construction." A ny of the following: (1) New construction of a residential building, nonresidential building or other structure in the municipality.(2) An addition involving a nonresidential building or other structure in the municipality.Section 602. Authorization.A municipality may not issue a building permit to an applicant unless all of the conditions under this chapter are satisfied.Section 603. Required information.(a) Purpose.--An applicant shall, in addition to satisfying other building permit conditions required by law, submit information for a determination of any negative effect on endangered or threatened species as a result of proposed 20250HB0052PN0042 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction.(b) Contents.--The information required under this section shall include the following:(1) The name, mailing address, telephone number and other contact information of the applicant.(2) The name, mailing address, telephone number and other contact information of the municipality in which the proposed construction is to be located.(3) The location and nature of the proposed construction.(c) Submittal.--The information required under this section shall be submitted to the following:(1) The Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission.(2) The Pennsylvania Game Commission.(3) The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.(d) Additional information.--An entity specified under subsection (c) may require:(1) A specific form on which to provide any or all of the required information.(2) A sketch plan, preliminary plan or final plan, together with engineering comments, regarding the proposed construction.Section 604. Review and determination.(a) Requirements.--Within 90 days of the submittal of the information under section 603, each entity under section 603(c) shall review the information and shall:(1) Determine whether there exists any negative effect on endangered or threatened species as a result of the proposed construction. In making the determination, the 20250HB0052PN0042 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity may:(i) Require a site visit to the location of the proposed construction.(ii) Engage in discussions with the applicant or engineer or other professional involved in the proposed construction.(iii) Work in collaboration and consultation with the other specified entities and other governmental entities at the Federal, State and local levels.(iv) Provide recommendations on remedial action that may be taken to mitigate the negative effect on endangered or threatened species.(2) Provide written confirmation of the effect on endangered or threatened species as a result of the proposed construction to:(i) The applicant.(ii) The municipality in which the proposed construction is to be located.(b) Noncompliance by entity.--If an entity under section 603(c) does not comply with the requirements specified under subsection (a):(1) It shall be presumed that there exists no negative effect on endangered or threatened species as a result of the proposed construction.(2) The municipality in which the proposed construction is to be located may issue a building permit to the applicant for the proposed construction.Section 605. Determination of negative effect.(a) Restriction on municipality.--If an entity under section 603(c) determines that there exists a negative effect on 20250HB0052PN0042 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 endangered or threatened species as a result of the proposed construction, the municipality in which the proposed construction is to be located may not issue a building permit for the proposed construction unless the applicant mitigates or eliminates the negative effect on endangered or threatened species, to the satisfaction of the entity that determined the existence of the negative effect.(b) Resubmittal of information.--(1) An applicant may be required by any of the following to resubmit the information under section 603 to reflect efforts to mitigate or eliminate a negative effect on endangered or threatened species as a result of the proposed construction:(i) The municipality in which the proposed construction is to be located.(ii) An entity under section 603(c) that initially determined the existence of the negative effect.(2) In the case of a resubmittal of information under this subsection, the requirements and conditions specified under section 604 apply.Section 606. Fees.(a) Authorization.--An entity under section 603(c) may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs related to the review and determination under section 604 and a resubmittal of information under section 605(b).(b) Considerations in determining fee.--The fee under subsection (a) may reflect the need for the following expenses incurred or anticipated to be incurred as a result of the review and determination:(1) Additional staffing or training.20250HB0052PN0042 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Travel for a site visit.(3) Other necessary administrative expenses.Section 607. Notice.Within 10 days of receiving the written confirmation from an entity under section 603(c) of the existence of a negative effect on endangered or threatened species as a result of proposed construction, the municipality in which the proposed construction is to be located shall provide written notice to the applicant that a building permit will not be issued for the proposed construction until the negative effect is mitigated or eliminated.Section 608. Appeal.If an applicant is aggrieved by the denial of the issuance of a building permit as a result of the determination by an entity under section 603(c) regarding the existence of a negative effect on endangered or threatened species as specified in this chapter, the applicant may, within 30 days of receiving the written notice under section 607, appeal the denial of the building permit as provided under section 501 or, if applicable, as otherwise provided under law.Section 609. Appropriation.The sum of $20,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the entities under section 603(c) for the purpose of recruiting and training the necessary staff to administer this chapter.Section 610. Applicability.This chapter does not apply to the following:(1) The addition, alteration or repair of a residential building.(2) The alteration or repair of a nonresidential 20250HB0052PN0042 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 building or other structure.Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The addition of section 609 of the act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0052PN0042 - 7 - 1234567